Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1143.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6344(c)(4) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6344. Employees having contact with children; adoptive and foster parents.* * *(c) Grounds for denying employment or participation in program, activity or service.--* * *(4) In addition to paragraphs (1), (2) and (3), in no case shall an employer, administrator, supervisor or other person responsible for employment decisions or involved in the selection of volunteers [at a child day-care center, group day-care home or family child-care home] hire or 12345678910111213141516171819 approve an applicant under any of the following circumstances:(i) The applicant's criminal history record information indicates the applicant has been convicted of any of the following:(A) One or more of the following offenses under Title 18 or an equivalent crime under Federal law or the law of another state:A felony offense under section 2718 (relating to strangulation).A felony offense under section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).(B) An offense under 18 U.S.C. § 2261 (relating to interstate domestic violence) or 2262 (relating to interstate violation of protection order).(ii) The applicant's name appears on the National Crime Information Center National Sex Offender Registry or on a state's sex offender registry.(iii) The applicant's name appears on a Statewide database or its equivalent as a perpetrator of child abuse.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1143PN1394 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223